Utah statutes.
77-10a-4.   Number of members -- Number required for indictment.
(1)  Any grand jury summoned under this chapter shall consist of not fewer
than nine or more than fifteen members.
(2)  The grand jury may return an indictment only if at least three-fourths of
the members, or the next highest whole number, vote in favor of the
indictment.
